Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.035

Employer contribution rates—Computation and payment.

The amount paid by each employer shall be computed by applying the rates established under chapter 41.45 RCW to the total earnable compensation of the employer's members as shown on the current payrolls of the employer. The employer's contribution shall be paid at the end of each month in the amount due for that month, except as provided in RCW 41.32.013.

[ 1990 c 274 s 8; 1989 c 273 s 18; 1984 c 236 s 3. Formerly RCW 41.32.403.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—Construction—1990 c 274: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Effective date—1984 c 236: "This act shall take effect September 1, 1985. However, rules necessary for the implementation of this act may be promulgated by appropriate state agencies prior to the effective date." [ 1984 c 236 s 6.]

Severability—1984 c 236: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1984 c 236 s 5.]